Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-1102
Violations; penalty.

Every manufacturer, importer or dealer who fails to comply with the provisions of section 69-1101 shall be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor for each and every such ball sold, offered or exposed for sale.

Laws 1967, c. 415, § 2, p. 1282;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 133.